Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-350
Inventory statements; failure to file; false statements; penalty.

Any county officer, including any member of any county board, who shall fail to file such inventory statements or who shall willfully make any false or incorrect statement therein, or who shall aid, abet, or connive in the making of any false or incorrect statement therein shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. As part of the judgment of conviction, the court may decree such officer guilty of malfeasance in office for a palpable omission of duty and subject to removal under section 28-924.

Laws 1939, c. 28, § 3, p. 141;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-760;

R.S.1943, § 23-350;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 89;

Laws 2001, LB 8, § 1.

For duties of county attorney upon notification of violation of section, see section 23-1201.